Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-409.02
Annual election;
notice; contents.

Notice of an annual election
held pursuant to section 31-409, 31-409.01, or 31-409.03 shall be published
once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
in the district, or the precinct if the district has been divided into voting
precincts as provided in section 31-409.03, designated by the district. The
last publication shall not be less than thirty days prior to the election.
The notice shall include the date and
location or locations of the election and the hours for voting, the number of directors
to be elected, the names of those whose terms will expire, and the procedure
for filing as a candidate.

Laws 1983, LB 191, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 1078, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB342, § 2.